Nebraska, session 109, LB864.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB864 LB864
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-1201.21, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1201.21 (1) There is hereby created the Job Training Cash Fund.
The fund shall be under the direction of the Department of Economic
Development. Money may be transferred to the fund pursuant to subdivision
(1)(b)(iii) of section 48-621 and from the Cash Reserve Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. The department shall establish a subaccount
for all money transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Job Training
Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2005.
(2) The money in the Job Training Cash Fund or the subaccount
established in subsection (1) of this section shall be used (a) to
provide reimbursements for job training activities, including employee
assessment, preemployment training, on-the-job training, training
equipment costs, and other reasonable costs related to helping industry
and business locate or expand in Nebraska, (b) to provide upgrade skills
training of the existing labor force necessary to adapt to new technology
or the introduction of new product lines, or (c) as provided in section
79-2308. The department shall give a preference to job training
activities carried out in whole or in part within an enterprise zone
designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act or an opportunity zone
designated pursuant to the federal Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, Public Law
115-97.
(3) The department shall establish a subaccount within the fund to
provide training grants for training employees and potential employees of
businesses that (a) employ twenty-five or fewer employees on the
application date, (b) employ, or train for potential employment,
residents of rural areas of Nebraska, or (c) are located in or employ, or
train for potential employment, residents of high-poverty areas as
defined in section 81-1203. The department shall calculate the amount of
prior year investment income earnings accruing to the fund and allocate
such amount to the subaccount for training grants under this subsection.
-2-

LB864 LB864
2026 2026
The subaccount shall also be used as provided in the Teleworker Job
Creation Act. The department shall give a preference to training grants
for businesses located in whole or in part within an enterprise zone
designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act.
(4) On April 5, 2018, any funds that were dedicated to carrying out
sections 2 to 4 of this act 81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03 but were not yet
expended shall be transferred to the Intern Nebraska Cash Fund.
(5) Transfers may be made from the Job Training Cash Fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Job
Training Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 2. Section 81-1210.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1210.01 For purposes of sections 2 to 4 of this act 81-1210.01 to
81-1210.03:
(1) Department means the Department of Labor Economic Development;
(2) Internship means employment of a student in a professional or
technical position for a limited period of time, by a business in
Nebraska, in which the student:
(a) Gains valuable applied work experiences;
(b) Increases knowledge and develops connections that assist with
career decisionmaking;
(c) Has the opportunity to match with an employer seeking talent to
evaluate, develop, and retain; or
(d) Receives credited or certified training for skilled positions
that will help resolve skilled workforce shortages and create talent
pipelines for Nebraska industries; and
(3) Student means any person who:
(a) Is in eleventh or twelfth grade in a public or private high
school or a school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet
-3-

LB864 LB864
2026 2026
accreditation or approval requirements in Nebraska;
(b) Is enrolled in a college, a university, a certified training
institution, or some other institution of higher education; or
(c) Applies for an internship within twelve months following
graduation from a public or private secondary school, a school that
elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval
requirements in Nebraska, or a college, a university, a certified
training institution, or some other institution of higher education.
Sec. 3. Section 81-1210.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1210.02 (1) The intent of sections 2 to 4 of this act 81-1210.01
to 81-1210.03 is to provide students with valuable internship
opportunities in order to retain such students in the State of Nebraska
at institutions of higher education, convert students to full-time
employment in Nebraska, and attract workers to Nebraska by assisting
Nebraska businesses willing to provide paid internships.
(2) A business may apply to the department for a grant to assist in
providing a student an internship if:
(a) The business certifies that the internship meets the definition
of internship in section 2 of this act 81-1210.01;
(b) The business will pay the student at least the state minimum
hourly wage for the internship;
(c) The internship will be completed within the State of Nebraska;
(d) The internship will be completed within a period of no more than
twenty-four months; and
(e) The internship will be for a duration sufficient to allow the
student to gain significant valuable work experience and knowledge.
(3)(a) The department may provide grants for internships to
reimburse the cost of wages paid to businesses with less than one hundred
fifty full-time-equivalent employees.
(b) The department may also provide grants for internships to any
-4-

LB864 LB864
2026 2026
business to reimburse the costs for any of the following:
(i) Tuition reimbursement for courses at institutions of higher
education;
(ii) Internship housing;
(iii) Transportation expenses relating to internships; and
(iv) Internship administrative or recruitment costs.
(c) The maximum grant award per internship is seven thousand five
hundred dollars.
(4) A business may apply for no more than two grants for the same
student and shall not be awarded more than one hundred grants total in
any twelve-month period.
(5) A business may allow a student to telecommute if the business is
located in Nebraska and the college, university, or other institution of
higher education in which the student is enrolled is in Nebraska.
(6) The department shall, to the extent possible, assure that the
distribution of grants under sections 2 to 4 of this act 81-1210.01 to
81-1210.03 provides equitable access to the grants by all geographic
areas of the state.
(7) The department shall, to the extent possible, assure that the
grants awarded pursuant to sections 2 to 4 of this act 81-1210.01 to
81-1210.03 are for internships which provide valuable learning
opportunities for students who will be seeking employment in a
professional or technical field.
(8) The department shall not allocate more than one million five
hundred thousand dollars in any one fiscal year from the Job Training
Cash Fund or its subaccounts for purposes of this section. The department
may receive funds from public, private, or other sources for purposes of
this section.
(9) The department shall develop a qualified action plan by January
1 of each even-numbered year. The plan shall, at a minimum, set forth the
department's priorities and selection criteria for awarding grants for
-5-

LB864 LB864
2026 2026
internships. In order to encourage students from across Nebraska to
pursue internships, the plan shall also include strategies for
affirmatively marketing internships to Nebraska students in high schools,
colleges, universities, and other institutions of higher education in
Nebraska. Such strategies shall place an emphasis on marketing to
underserved student populations as defined by the department in the plan.
The department shall submit the plan to the Governor for approval.
(10) The department shall execute a memorandum of understanding with
the Department of Labor before December 31, 2022, to ensure the exchange
of available Department of Labor data throughout the continuum from
prekindergarten to postsecondary education to the workforce. The
department may utilize data and agreements under sections 79-776, 85-110,
85-309, and 85-1511.
(11) The department shall submit an annual report to the Governor
and the Legislature on or before July 1 of each year which includes, but
is not limited to, a description of the demand for internship grants and
programs under sections 2 to 4 of this act 81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03 from
all geographic regions in Nebraska, a listing of the recipients and
amounts of internship grants awarded in the previous fiscal year, the
impact of the internship grants, and an evaluation of the internship
grants and programs under sections 2 to 4 of this act 81-1210.01 to
81-1210.03 based on the documented goals of the recipients. The report
submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. The
department may require recipients to provide periodic performance reports
to enable the department to fulfill the requirements of this subsection.
The report shall contain no information that is protected by state or
federal confidentiality laws.
(12) The department may enter into a contract with a Nebraska-based
nonprofit entity for the purposes of carrying out any or all of the
provisions of sections 2 to 4 of this act 81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03.
Sec. 4. Section 81-1210.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-6-

LB864 LB864
2026 2026
amended to read:
81-1210.03 The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to govern the award and disbursement of grants pursuant to
sections 2 to 4 of this act 81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03.
Sec. 5. Section 81-1210.04, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1210.04 (1) The Intern Nebraska Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be used to carry out sections 2 to 4 of this act 81-1210.01 to
81-1210.03. The fund shall consist of money transferred to the fund by
the Legislature and money donated as gifts, bequests, or other
contributions from public or private entities. Transfers may be made from
the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Intern Nebraska Cash Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The Department of Labor Economic Development, or any entity with
which the department contracts for such purpose, may use up to five
percent of any appropriation to carry out sections 2 to 4 of this act
81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03 for administrative services.
Sec. 6. The Revisor of Statutes shall assign sections 2 to 5 of
this act to Chapter 81, article 4.
Sec. 7. Original sections 81-1210.01, 81-1210.02, and 81-1210.03,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 81-1201.21 and
81-1210.04, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-7-